Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.020

Aircraft dealer licensure—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to act as an aircraft dealer without a currently valid aircraft dealer's license issued under this chapter.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person acting as an aircraft dealer without a currently issued aircraft dealer's license is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by either a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or both.

(b) A person convicted on a second or subsequent conviction within a five-year period is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished by either a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or by imprisonment for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

(3) In addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided in this section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence that may be imposed under this section, the court in its discretion may prohibit the violator from acting as an aircraft dealer within the state for such a period as it may determine but not to exceed one year. Violation of the duly imposed prohibition of the court may be treated as a separate offense under this section or as contempt of court.

(4) Any person applying for an aircraft dealer's license shall do so at the office of the secretary on a form provided for that purpose by the secretary.

[ 2011 c 96 s 15; 2003 c 53 s 102; 1993 c 208 s 2; 1984 c 7 s 10; 1983 c 135 s 1; 1955 c 150 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.